Washington statutes.
RCW 18.215.060

Registration of applicant—Fee.

The secretary shall register an applicant on forms provided by the secretary. Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee shall accompany the application.

[ 1999 c 335 s 7.]